Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 2 Adulteration and Misbranding of Food
26-2-34.1.
Confidential information.

The following information, records, and data obtained by the Department of Agriculture from the federal Food and Drug Administration pursuant to a contract or commissioning agreement shall be deemed confidential and shall not be open to inspection by the public, to the extent that it was obtained or furnished on a confidential basis or is exempt from disclosure under 5 U.S.C. Sec. 552, the federal Freedom of Information Act: trade secrets; confidential commercial information; information under the federal deliberative process privilege; information compiled for law enforcement purposes; or information expressly required to be kept confidential by other federal laws.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-2-34.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 486, § 1/SB 381.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

26-2-35.
Food regulations.

Whenever in the judgment of the Commissioner such action will promote honesty and fair dealing in the interest of the consumers, the Commissioner shall promulgate regulations fixing and establishing for any food or any class of food a reasonable definition and standard of identity and, if applicable, a reasonable standard of quality and fill of container.

In prescribing a definition and a standard of identity for any food or class of food in which optional ingredients are permitted, the Commissioner shall, for the purpose of promoting honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, designate the optional ingredients which shall be named on the label. The definitions and standards so promulgated shall conform so far as practicable to the definitions and standards promulgated under authority of the federal act.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 195, § 9.

26-2-36.
Right of entry in food establishments and transport vehicles; examination of samples obtained.

The Commissioner or his duly authorized agent shall have free access during all hours of operation and at all other reasonable hours to any factory, warehouse, or establishment in which food is manufactured, processed, packed, or held for introduction into commerce and any vehicle being used to transport or hold such foods to commerce for the purposes:

Of inspecting such factory, warehouse, establishment, or vehicle, any records of pathogen destruction, and any records of testing of samples or specimens of foods or ingredients for the presence of poisonous or deleterious substances or other contaminants and the results thereof as may be required pursuant to Code Section 26-2-27.1, to determine if any of the provisions of this article are being violated; and

Of securing samples or specimens of any food, after paying or offering to pay for such sample.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to make or cause to be made examinations of samples secured under subsection (a) of this Code section to determine whether or not this article is being violated.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 195, § 16; Ga. L. 2009, p. 441, § 3/SB 80.

26-2-37.
Temporary permits.

Whenever the Commissioner finds, after investigation, that the distribution in Georgia of any class of food may, by reason of contamination with microorganisms during manufacture, processing, or packing thereof in any locality, be injurious to health and that such injurious nature cannot be adequately determined after such articles have entered commerce, he then, and in such case only, shall promulgate regulations providing for the issuance to manufacturers, processors, or packers of such class of food in such locality of permits to which shall be attached such conditions governing the manufacture, processing, or packing of such class of food, for such temporary period of time, as may be necessary to protect the public health; and, after the effective date of such regulations and during such temporary period, no person shall introduce or deliver for introduction into commerce any such food manufactured, processed, or packed by any such manufacturer, processor, or packer unless such manufacturer, processor, or packer holds a permit issued by the Commissioner as provided by such regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to suspend immediately upon notice any permit issued under authority of this Code section if it is found that any of the conditions of the permit have been violated. The holder of a permit so suspended shall be privileged at any time to apply for the reinstatement of such permit. The Commissioner shall, immediately after prompt hearing and inspection of the establishment, reinstate such permit if it is found that adequate measures have been taken to comply with and maintain the conditions of the permit as originally issued or as amended.

Any officer or employee duly designated by the Commissioner shall have access to any factory or establishment, the operator of which holds a permit from the Department of Agriculture, for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not the conditions of the permit are being complied with. Denial of access for such inspection shall be grounds for suspension of the permit until such access is freely given by the owner or operator.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 195, § 12.

26-2-38.
Detention or embargo of adulterated or misbranded food.

Whenever a duly authorized agent of the Commissioner finds or has probable cause to believe that any food is adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this article, such agent shall affix to such article or to any container, field, building, or structure which contains such article a tag or other appropriate marking, giving notice that such article is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or embargoed and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of such article by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the agent or the court. It shall be unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of such detained or embargoed article by sale or otherwise without permission of the Commissioner. Upon application, the Commissioner shall grant permission to move or dispose of such article to a safe and secure area and in a safe and secure manner.

When an article detained or embargoed under subsection (a) of this Code section has been found by such agent to be adulterated or misbranded, he shall bring an action for condemnation of such article in the superior court of the county where the article is detained or embargoed. When such agent has found that an article so detained or embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, he shall remove the tags or other markings.

If the court finds that a detained or embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, such article shall, after entry of the decree, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant thereof under the supervision of the Commissioner and all court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses shall be taxed against the claimant of such article or his agent, provided that, when the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article, the court, after entry of the decree and after such costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond conditioned that such article shall be so labeled or processed, has been executed, may by proper order direct that such article be delivered to the claimant thereof for such labeling or processing under the supervision of an agent of the Commissioner. The expense of such supervision shall be paid by the claimant. Such shall be returned to the claimant of the article on representation to the court by the Commissioner that the article is no longer in violation of this article and that the expense of such supervision has been paid.

Whenever the Commissioner or any of his authorized agents shall find in any room, building, vehicle for transportation, or other structure any meat, seafood, poultry, vegetables, fruit, or other perishable articles which are unsound, which contain any filthy, decomposed, or putrid substances, or which might be poisonous or deleterious to health or otherwise unsafe, the same shall be declared to be a nuisance and the Commissioner or his authorized agent shall immediately condemn or destroy or in any other manner render the same unsalable as human food.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 195, § 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 197, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 189, § 2.

26-2-39.
Summaries of judgments, decrees, and court orders; dissemination of information in the interest of health and protection of consumers against fraud.

The Commissioner may cause to be published from time to time reports summarizing all judgments, decrees, and court orders which have been rendered under this article, including the nature of the charge and the disposition thereof.

The Commissioner may also cause to be disseminated such information regarding food as the Commissioner deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit the Commissioner from collecting, reporting, and illustrating the results of the investigations of the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 195, § 17.

26-2-40.
Minor violations of article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring the Commissioner to report, for the institution of proceedings under this article, minor violations of this article whenever the Commissioner believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 195, § 8.

26-2-41.
Prosecution of violations; notice to defendant prior to institution of criminal proceeding.

It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney to whom the Commissioner reports any violation of this article to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the appropriate court without delay and to prosecute the same in the manner provided by law. Before any violation of this article is reported to any prosecuting attorney for the institution of a criminal proceeding, the person against whom such proceeding is contemplated shall be given appropriate notice and an opportunity to present his views before the Commissioner or his designated agent orally or in writing, in person, or by attorney, with regard to such contemplated proceedings.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 195, § 7.